Utah statutes.
52-1-7.   Bonds to be deemed security.

The official bond of a public officer shall be deemed a security to the state, county, city, town, school district or other municipal or public corporation, as the case may be, and also to all persons severally, for official delinquencies against which it is intended to provide.



No Change Since 1953

